New York, session 2025-2026, A6450.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The retirement and social security law is amended by adding 2 a new section 89-z to read as follows: 3 § 89-z. Optional twenty-five year retirement plan for county police 4 communications operators, police communications operator supervisors, 5 assistant bureau directors (police 911 communications) and bureau direc- 6 tors (police 911 communications). a. Any member who is a county police 7 communications operator, police communications operator supervisor, 8 assistant bureau director (police 911 communications) or bureau director 9 (police 911 communications) in an electing county, shall be eligible to 10 retire pursuant to the provisions of this section. Such eligibility 11 shall be an alternative to the eligibility provisions available under 12 any other plan of this article to which such member is subject. The 13 comptroller shall have the authority to include positions herein that 14 comprehend the same duties and responsibilities, but are named differ- 15 ently. 16 b. Such member shall be entitled to retire upon the completion of 17 twenty-five years of total creditable service by filing an application 18 therefor in the manner provided for in section seventy of this article. 19 c. Upon completion of twenty-five years of such service and upon 20 retirement, each such member shall receive a pension which, together 21 with an annuity which shall be the actuarial equivalent of such member's 22 accumulated contributions at the time of retirement and an additional EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01079-08-6 A. 6450--A 2 1 pension which is the actuarial equivalent of the reserved-for-in- 2 creased-take-home-pay to which such member may then be entitled shall be 3 sufficient to provide such member with a retirement allowance equal to 4 one-half of their final average salary. 5 d. As used in this section "creditable service" shall include any and 6 all services performed as a county police communications operator, 7 police communications operator supervisor, assistant bureau director 8 (police 911 communications) and bureau director (police 911 communi- 9 cations). 10 e. Credit for service as a member or officer of the state police or as 11 a paid firefighter, police officer or officer of any organized fire 12 department or police force or department of any county, city, village, 13 town, fire district or police district, or as a criminal investigator in 14 the office of a district attorney, or as a probation assistant in a 15 county probation department, shall also be deemed to be creditable 16 service and shall be included in computing years of total service for 17 retirement pursuant to this section. 18 f. The chief executive officer in each county shall certify to the 19 comptroller, periodically and at such intervals of time as may be 20 required and in such fashion as may be prescribed, the identity of the 21 eligible police communications operators, police communications operator 22 supervisors, assistant bureau directors (police 911 communications) and 23 bureau directors (police 911 communications) in such chief executive 24 officer's employ. 25 g. A member contributing on the basis of this section at the time of 26 retirement shall retire after the completion of twenty-five years of 27 total creditable service. Application therefor may be filed in a manner 28 similar to that provided in section seventy of this article. Upon 29 completion of twenty-five years of such service and upon retirement, 30 each such member shall receive a pension which, together with an annuity 31 which shall be the actuarial equivalent of their accumulated contrib- 32 utions at the time of retirement and an additional pension which is the 33 actuarial equivalent of the reserved-for-increased-take-home-pay to 34 which such member may then be entitled, shall be sufficient to provide 35 such member with a retirement allowance equal to one-half of their final 36 average salary. 37 h. In computing the twenty-five years of total service of a member 38 pursuant to this section full credit shall be given and full allowance 39 shall be made for service of such member in time of war after World War 40 I as defined in section two of this chapter, provided such member at the 41 time of their entrance into the armed forces was in the service of the 42 county of their employer that makes the election provided for herein. 43 i. Nothing herein shall be construed to prevent a member, who does not 44 retire pursuant to the provisions of this section, from utilizing 45 service which is creditable service pursuant to the provisions of this 46 section for service credit pursuant to the provisions of any other plan 47 of this article to which such member is subject. 48 j. 1. Each county that elects pursuant to the provisions of this 49 subdivision shall pay the cost attributable therefor. 50 2. The benefits of this section shall be available only to those 51 members defined in subdivision a of this section whose employer elects 52 to provide such benefits by adopting a resolution to such effect and 53 filing a certified copy thereof with the comptroller. Such resolution 54 shall be accompanied by the affidavit of the chief executive officer of 55 the county that the county has received an estimate from the retirement 56 system of the cost of the benefit provided by this section. A. 6450--A 3 1 k. The provisions of this section shall be controlling notwithstanding 2 any other provision in this article to the contrary. 3 § 2. Subdivision a of section 445 of the retirement and social securi- 4 ty law, as amended by section 2 of part TT of chapter 55 of the laws of 5 2025, is amended to read as follows: 6 a. No member of a retirement system who is subject to the provisions 7 of this article shall retire without regard to age, exclusive of retire- 8 ment for disability, unless they are a police officer, an investigator 9 member of the New York city employees' retirement system, firefighter, 10 correction officer, a qualifying member as defined in section eighty- 11 nine-t, as added by chapter six hundred fifty-seven of the laws of nine- 12 teen hundred ninety-eight, of this chapter, sanitation worker, a special 13 officer (including persons employed by the city of New York in the title 14 urban park ranger or associate urban park ranger), school safety agent, 15 campus peace officer or a taxi and limousine commission inspector member 16 of the New York city employees' retirement system or the New York city 17 board of education retirement system, a dispatcher member of the New 18 York city employees' retirement system, a police communications member 19 of the New York city employees' retirement system, an EMT member of the 20 New York city employees' retirement system, a deputy sheriff member of 21 the New York city employees' retirement system, a correction officer of 22 the Westchester county correction department as defined in section 23 eighty-nine-e of this chapter or employed in Suffolk county as a peace 24 officer, as defined in section eighty-nine-s, as added by chapter five 25 hundred eighty-eight of the laws of nineteen hundred ninety-seven, of 26 this chapter, employed in Suffolk county as a correction officer, as 27 defined in section eighty-nine-f of this chapter, or employed in Nassau 28 county as a correction officer, uniformed correction division personnel, 29 sheriff, undersheriff or deputy sheriff, as defined in section eighty- 30 nine-g of this chapter, or employed in Nassau county as an ambulance 31 medical technician, an ambulance medical technician/supervisor or a 32 member who performs ambulance medical technician related services, or a 33 police medic, police medic supervisor or a member who performs police 34 medic related services, as defined in section eighty-nine-s, as amended 35 by chapter five hundred seventy-eight of the laws of nineteen hundred 36 ninety-eight, of this chapter, or employed in Nassau county as a peace 37 officer, as defined in section eighty-nine-s, as added by chapter five 38 hundred ninety-five of the laws of nineteen hundred ninety-seven, of 39 this chapter, or employed in Albany county as a sheriff, undersheriff, 40 deputy sheriff, correction officer or identification officer, as defined 41 in section eighty-nine-h of this chapter or is employed in St. Lawrence 42 county as a sheriff, undersheriff, deputy sheriff or correction officer, 43 as defined in section eighty-nine-i of this chapter or is employed in 44 Orleans county as a sheriff, undersheriff, deputy sheriff or correction 45 officer, as defined in section eighty-nine-l of this chapter or is 46 employed in Jefferson county as a sheriff, undersheriff, deputy sheriff 47 or correction officer, as defined in section eighty-nine-j of this chap- 48 ter or is employed in Onondaga county as a deputy sheriff-jail division 49 competitively appointed or as a correction officer, as defined in 50 section eighty-nine-k of this chapter or is employed in a county which 51 makes an election under subdivision j of section eighty-nine-p of this 52 chapter as a sheriff, undersheriff, deputy sheriff or correction officer 53 as defined in such section eighty-nine-p or is employed in Broome County 54 as a sheriff, undersheriff, deputy sheriff or correction officer, as 55 defined in section eighty-nine-m of this chapter or is a Monroe county 56 deputy sheriff-court security, or deputy sheriff-jailor as defined in A. 6450--A 4 1 section eighty-nine-n, as added by chapter five hundred ninety-seven of 2 the laws of nineteen hundred ninety-one, of this chapter or is employed 3 in Greene county as a sheriff, undersheriff, deputy sheriff or 4 correction officer, as defined in section eighty-nine-o of this chapter 5 or is a traffic officer with the town of Elmira as defined in section 6 eighty-nine-q of this chapter or is employed by Suffolk county as a park 7 police officer, as defined in section eighty-nine-r of this chapter or 8 is a peace officer employed by a county probation department as defined 9 in section eighty-nine-t, as added by chapter six hundred three of the 10 laws of nineteen hundred ninety-eight, of this chapter or is employed in 11 Rockland county as a deputy sheriff-civil as defined in section eighty- 12 nine-v of this chapter as added by chapter four hundred forty-one of the 13 laws of two thousand one, or is employed in Rockland county as a superi- 14 or correction officer as defined in section eighty-nine-v of this chap- 15 ter as added by chapter five hundred fifty-six of the laws of two thou- 16 sand one or is a paramedic employed by the police department in the town 17 of Tonawanda and retires under the provisions of section eighty-nine-v 18 of this chapter, as added by chapter four hundred seventy-two of the 19 laws of two thousand one, or is a county fire marshal, supervising fire 20 marshal, fire marshal, assistant fire marshal, assistant chief fire 21 marshal, chief fire marshal, division supervising fire marshal or fire 22 marshal trainee employed by the county of Nassau as defined in section 23 eighty-nine-w of this chapter or is employed in Monroe county as a depu- 24 ty sheriff-civil as defined in section eighty-nine-x of this chapter, 25 employed as an emergency medical technician, critical care technician, 26 advanced emergency medical technician, paramedic or supervisor of such 27 titles in a participating Suffolk county fire district as defined in 28 section eighty-nine-ss of this chapter, or is a firefighter apprentice, 29 airport firefighter I, airport firefighter II, airport firefighter III, 30 or training and safety officer employed by the division of military and 31 naval affairs as defined in section eighty-nine-y of this chapter, or is 32 a county police communications operator, police communications operator 33 supervisor, assistant bureau director (police 911 communications) and 34 bureau director (police 911 communications) as defined in section eight- 35 y-nine-z of this chapter and is in a plan which permits immediate 36 retirement upon completion of a specified period of service without 37 regard to age. Except as provided in subdivision c of section four 38 hundred forty-five-a of this article, subdivision c of section four 39 hundred forty-five-b of this article, subdivision c of section four 40 hundred forty-five-c of this article, subdivision c of section four 41 hundred forty-five-d of this article, subdivision c of section four 42 hundred forty-five-e of this article, subdivision c of section four 43 hundred forty-five-f of this article and subdivision c of section four 44 hundred forty-five-h of this article, a member in such a plan and such 45 an occupation, other than a police officer or investigator member of the 46 New York city employees' retirement system or a firefighter, shall not 47 be permitted to retire prior to the completion of twenty-five years of 48 credited service; provided, however, if such a member in such an occupa- 49 tion is in a plan which permits retirement upon completion of twenty 50 years of service regardless of age, they may retire upon completion of 51 twenty years of credited service and prior to the completion of twenty- 52 five years of service, but in such event the benefit provided from funds 53 other than those based on such a member's own contributions shall not 54 exceed two per centum of final average salary per each year of credited 55 service. A. 6450--A 5 1 § 3. Section 603 of the retirement and social security law is amended 2 by adding a new subdivision x to read as follows: 3 x. The service retirement benefit specified in section six hundred 4 four of this article shall be payable to members with twenty-five years 5 of creditable service, without regard to age, who are employed as a 6 county police communications operator, police communications operator 7 supervisor, assistant bureau director (police 911 communications) and 8 bureau director (police 911 communications) as defined in section eight- 9 y-nine-z of this chapter if: (i) such members have met the minimum 10 service requirements upon retirement; and (ii) in the case of a member 11 subject to the provisions of article fourteen of this chapter, such 12 member files an election therefor which provides that they will be 13 subject to the provisions of this article and to none of the provisions 14 of such article fourteen. Such election, which shall be irrevocable, 15 shall be in writing, duly executed and shall be filed with the comp- 16 troller within one year of the effective date of this subdivision or 17 within one year after entering the employment with such county upon 18 which eligibility is based, whichever comes later. For the purposes of 19 this subdivision, the term "creditable service" shall have the meaning 20 as so defined in both sections eighty-nine-z and six hundred one of this 21 chapter. 22 § 4. Section 604 of the retirement and social security law is amended 23 by adding a new subdivision x to read as follows: 24 x. The early service retirement benefit for a member who is employed 25 as a county police communications operator, police communications opera- 26 tor supervisor, assistant bureau director (police 911 communications) 27 and bureau director (police 911 communications) as defined in section 28 eighty-nine-z of this chapter shall be a pension equal to one-fiftieth 29 of final average salary times years of credited service at the 30 completion of twenty-five years of service as such police communications 31 operator, police communications operator supervisor, assistant bureau 32 director (police 911 communications) and bureau director (police 911 33 communications), but not exceeding one-half of their final average sala- 34 ry; for service beyond twenty-five years the benefits shall increase by 35 one-sixtieth of final average salary for each year of additional service 36 credit provided, however, that the total allowance payable pursuant to 37 this section shall not exceed three-fourths of such member's final aver- 38 age salary. 39 § 5. All past service costs incurred with implementing the provisions 40 of this act shall be borne by any county that elects to provide the 41 benefits provided by this act. 42 § 6. This act shall take effect the first of January next succeeding 43 the date on which it shall have become a law. FISCAL NOTE.--Pursuant to Legislative Law, Section 50: This bill would allow counties to elect to provide police communi- cations operators and similar titles, the option to retire with twenty- five years of service credit. The benefit would be one-half of final average salary (FAS) plus, for Tiers 3 through 6 only, one-sixtieth of FAS for each additional year of creditable service, not to exceed three- fourths (75%) of FAS. Additionally, members covered under Article 14 would be permitted one year to make an irrevocable election to switch to the twenty-five-year plan benefit. We estimate that the annual contribution required of an electing employer will increase by 7% of the salary paid to the affected members. Annual costs will vary as the billing rates and salary of the affected members change. A. 6450--A 6 In addition, there will be an immediate past service cost borne by each electing employer as a one-time payment. This cost will vary by employer but is expected to average approximately 30% of the salary paid to the affected members. Further, we anticipate additional administrative costs to implement the provisions of this legislation. The exact number of current members as well as future members who could be affected by this legislation cannot be readily determined. Prior to electing to provide these benefits, an employer would be required to submit a roster of eligible members to the New York State and Local Retirement System. This roster would be used to determine an exact cost to the individual employer electing to provide these bene- fits. Summary of relevant resources: Membership data as of March 31, 2025 was used to measure the impact of the bill, the same data used in the Actuarial Valuations dated April 1, 2025. Distributions and other statistics can be found in the 2025 Report of the Actuary and the 2025 Annual Comprehensive Financial Report. The actuarial assumptions and methods used are described in the 2025 Annual Report to the Comptroller on Actuarial Assumptions, and the Codes, Rules and Regulations of the State of New York: Audit and Control. The fair value of assets and GASB disclosures can be found in the 2025 Financial Statements and Supplementary Information. Assumptions, demographics, and other considerations may have been modified to better reflect specific provisions of any proposed benefit change(s). This fiscal note does not constitute a legal opinion on the viability of the bill, nor is it intended to serve as a substitute for the profes- sional judgment of an attorney. This estimate, dated February 11, 2026, and intended for use only during the 2026 Legislative Session, is Fiscal Note Number 2026-56. As Chief Actuary of the New York State and Local Retirement System (NYSLRS), I, Aaron Schottin Young, hereby certify that this analysis complies with applicable Actuarial Standards of Practice as well as the Code of Professional Conduct and Qualification Standards for Actuaries Issuing Statements of Actuarial Opinion of the American Academy of Actu- aries, of which I am a member. I am a member of NYSLRS but do not believe it impairs my objectivity.